output/hyph-id-gpu.pat.txt
tima3t
3tin
tinen3
3tio
ti3o
3tip
ti3p
tip3an
3tir
3tis
tisik3
tisi3p
tisipa3
tisis3
tisi3t
3tit
ti3t
titu3
titu1
3tiu
ti3u
3tiv
ti3v
3tiw
ti3w
t1j
t3je
t1k
t3ka
tka3m
tke3
t3ke
tku3
t3ku
t1l
t3la
t3le
t1m
t3ma
t3me
t3mi
tmos3
t1n
t3na
t3ni
tno3
t3ny
to1
1to
3to.
3toa
to3a
3tob
to3b
3tod
to3d
to3e
3tof
to3f
3tog
to3g
3toh
3toi
to3i
3tok
3tol
to3l
tole3r
3tom
to3m
toma3
tome3
tomo3
3ton
3top
topo3
3tor
3tos
to3s
3tot
to3t
totok3
3tov
to3v
3toz
to3z
t1p
1tr
3tra
tra1
trake3
tral3a
trans3
tra3t
trau3
tria3s
3trib
3trik.
3trikan
tri3l
trili3
tri3m
3trin
3tris
tri3t
tro3
3tro
truk3
3trum.
3trus
t1s
t3sa
t3se
t3si
t3su
t1t
t3ta
1tu
3tu.
3tua
tu3a
tua3s
3tub
3tud
tu3d
3tug
tu3g
tuh3
3tuh
tuhan3
3tui
tu3i
3tuj
tu3j
tuju3
3tuk
tukar3
3tul
tum3
3tum
3tun
3tup
3tur
3tus
tus3a
tus1a
3tut
tut3a
tutur3
t3wa
tya3
t3ya
u1a
u3a.
ua3a
ua3b
ua3c
u3ad
uah3
u3ah
uai3
u3ai
u3ak
u3al
uali3
u3am
u3an
uanti3
uap3
u3ap
uap1
u3ar
u3as
ua3sa
uasi3
u3at
uat3a
uat1a
ua3y
u1b
u3ba
u3be
u3bi
ub3k
ub3l
ub3m
ubor3
ub3or
ub3r
ub3s
ub3t
u3bu
ubur3a
u1c
u3ca
ucap3
3ucap
u3ce
ucek3
u3ci
u3cu
ucur3
u1d
u3da
udah3
uda1r
u3de
u3di
ud3k
udo3
u3do
udo1
ud3r
u3du
uduk3
udut3
u1e
u3e.
u3el
u3en
u3et
u3fa
ufo3
u1g
u3ga
ugas3
u3ge
uges3
u3gi
u3gu
ugur3
uh1
uh3a
uh3b
uh3k
uh3s
uh3t
u3hu
u1i
ui3d
u3id
uida3
u3ik
u3il
u3in
u3ir
u3is
uisi3
u3it
u1j
u3ja
uji3
u3ji
uji1
u3ju
ujur3
ujur1
ukaci3
ukar3an
ukasu3
uk3b
u3ke
uk1i.
ukir3
3ukir
ukis3
uk3k
uk3l
ukle3
uk3m
uk3n
uko3
u3ko
uk3p
uk3s
uk3t
u3ku
ukul3
ukul1
ukup3
ukur3
u1l
u3la
ula3f
ula3s
ulat3a
ul3b
ul3d
u3le
ul3f
ul3g
ul3h
u3li
ulih3
ulis3
ulis1
ul3j
ul3k
ul3l
ul3m
ulo3
u3lo
ul3p
ul3r
ul3s
ul3t
u3lu
uluh3
ulul3
ulur3
ulur1
ulus3
ulus1
um1
u3ma
umah3
um3b
umbuk3
u3me
u3mi
um3k
um3l
um3n
u3mo
um3p
umpa3m
umpul3
umput3
um3r
um3s
u3mu
umum3
umur3
umus3
un3an
un1an
un3b
un3c
uncur3
un3d
undur3
u3ne
ung3
ungan3
unggul3
ungsi3
ungut3
ungut1
uni3
u3ni
un3j
un3k
uno3
u3no
un3r
un3s
un3t
untur3
u3nu
u3ny
unyi3
uo1
u1o
uo3r
u3or
u3pa
3upah
upa3l
up3an
up1an
3upay
upaya3
u3pe
up3k
up1l
u3po
up3r
up1r
upra3
up3s
up3t
u3pu
urah3a
urai3
u3ram
ur3an
uran3s
u3rans
urat3a
ur3b
u3re
ur3g
ur3h
u3ri
uriku3
urisa3
ur3j
ur3k
ur3l
ur3m
ur3n
urna3
urni3
uro3
u3ro
ur3s
ur3t
u3ru
uruk3
urus3
urus1
urut3
urut1
ur3v
ur3w
usaha3
3usaha
usa3ha
1usaha
us3an
us3d
u3se
u3si
us3k
us3l
us3n
u3so
us3p
us3r
us3t
usta3
u3su
usuh3
usuk3a
usul3
usur3
usut3
u3sy
usyawa3
uta3kh
uta3m
uta1m
ut3an
uta3s
ut3b
u3te
ut3i.
ut1i.
utih3
utis3
ut3k
ut3l
ut3m
ut3n
uto3
u3to
ut3r
ut1r
utra3
utri3
ut3s
ut3t
u3tu
utus3
utus1
u1v
u3ve
uve3n
uvi3
u3vi
u1w
u3wa
uwa1
uwa3l
u3we
u3wi
u3wo
u1y
u3ya
u3yu
uyur3
u3za
va1
1va
3va.
vagi3
3vak
vakua3
3val
va3l
valen3
valida3
valu3
valu1
valua3
valua1
3van
va3p
3var
vari3
3vas
va3s
vaso3
3vat
va3t
1ve
3ve.
vege3
vegeta3
3vei
3vek
3vel
ven3
3ven
ven1
venta3
veo3
ve3o
ver3
3ver
vermi3
versi3
verti3
ves3
3ves
ves1
3vet
vi1
1vi
3via
vi3a
via3s
3vid
vi3d
vidu3
vi3g
viga3
3vik
3vil
vili3
3vin
vio3
3vio
vi3o
vi3p
3vir
vi3r
3vis
visa3
visi3
visko3
visu3
3vit
vi3t
vitali3
vita3m
vita1m
3viu
vi3u
vo1
1vo
3vok
vo3k
voka3
voka1
3vol
volu3
3von
3vor
vul3
vul1
vulka3
1wa
3wa.
3waa
wa3a
3wab
wa3c
waca3
3wad
wa3d
3wah
3wai
3waj
wa3j
3wak
3wal
wali3
3wam
3wan
wanca3
wangi3
wa3ngi
wanu3
3war
warala3
waris3
warta3
3was
waspa3
wasta3
3wat
3waw
wa3w
wawan3
wawan1
wa3y
1we
3we.
we3d
3wek
3wel
3wen
3wer
3wes
3wet
wi1
1wi
3wi.
wi3a
wi3b
wiba3
wi3c
wica3
wi3j
wija3
3wik
3wil
wila3
wila1
3win
wi3p
3wir
wira3
wi3ra
wira1
3wis
wisa3
wisu3
3wit
wiya3
1wo
3wo.
3wok
3won
3wot
1wu
3wu.
3wuj
wu3j
wujud3
3wun
3wur
xan3
xero3
1ya.
3yaa
ya3a
1yaa
ya3b
ya3d
ya3g
1yah
ya3j
1yaka
3yakan
yakin3
3yakin
1yan
3yan.
3yang.
3yanga
3yangb
3yangi
3yangkan
yara3k
yarakat3
yarat3
ya3sa
3yasa.
1yat
3yat.
yau3m
ya3w
ya3y
ye1
ye3b
yebe3
ye3d
ye3g
ye3j
3yeks
3yekt
yeku3
ye3l
yeli3s
yelu3s
yem1
yendi3
ye3nga
ye3p
ye3r
yerah3
yerem3
yeru3
ye3s
ye3w
y1h
y3hu
yi1
yi3a
yi3b
yi3g
yi3l
yim3
yim1
yi3p
yi3r
yi3s
yo3b
yo3d
yo3g
3yonga
yo3p
y3ri
3yu.
1yu.
yu3a
3yuan
1yuan
yu3c
yu3d
yu3g
3yuh
yu3ka
3yukan
yu3l
yum3
3yun.
1yun.
3yung.
1yung.
3yuran
yu3s
yu1s
yut3
yut1
yuwa3
1za
3za.
3zah
3zam
3zan
3zar
3zat
1ze
3zen
ze3n
1zi
3zi.
3zia
zi3a
zia3r
3zil
3zim
3zin
3zir
zo1
1zo
3zoa
3zoi
zo3i
3zon
zoo3
3zoo
zo3o
1zu
3zul
}
